California statutes. Public Contract Code
(c) This section shall not apply to progress payments published under Section 10262.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.

The contractor shall pay to his or her subcontractors, within seven days of receipt of each progress payment, the respective amounts allowed the contractor on account of the work performed by his or her subcontractors, to the extent of each subcontractor’s interest therein. The payments to subcontractors shall be based on estimates made pursuant to Section 10261. Any diversion by the contractor of payments received for prosecution of a contract, or failure to reasonably account for the application or use of the payments constitutes ground for actions prescribed in Section 10253, in addition to disciplinary action by the Contractors’ State License Board. The subcontractor shall notify, in writing, the Contractors’ State License Board and the department of any payment
 less than the amount or percentage approved for the class or item of work as set forth in Section 10261.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 700, Sec. 8.   (SB 293)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.3.

To facilitate enforcement of Section 10262, the Department of General Services shall publish in the California State Contracts Register notice of progress payments made to prime contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a prime contractor or subcontractor shall pay to any subcontractor, not later than seven days after receipt of each progress payment, the respective amounts allowed the contractor on account of the work performed by the subcontractors, to the extent of each subcontractor’s interest therein. In the event that there is a good faith dispute over all or any portion of the amount due on a progress payment from the prime contractor or subcontractor to a subcontractor, then the prime contractor or subcontractor may withhold no more than 150 percent of the disputed amount.

Any contractor who violates this section shall pay to the subcontractor a penalty of 2 percent of the amount due per month for every month that
 payment is not made. In any action for the collection of funds wrongfully withheld, the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her attorney’s fees and costs.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit or impair any contractual, administrative, or judicial remedies otherwise available to a contractor or a subcontractor in the event of a dispute involving late payment or nonpayment by a contractor or deficient subcontract performance or nonperformance by a subcontractor.

(c) On or before September 1 of each year, the head of each state agency shall submit to the Legislature a report on the number and dollar volume of written complaints received from subcontractors and prime contractors on contracts in excess of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), relating to violations of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 700, Sec. 9.   (SB 293)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10263.

(a) Provisions shall be included in any invitation for bid and in any contract documents to permit the substitution of securities for any moneys withheld by a public agency to ensure performance under a contract. At the request and expense of the contractor, securities equivalent to the amount withheld shall be deposited with the State Treasurer or, a state or federally chartered bank in this state, as the escrow agent, who shall then pay the moneys to the contractor. Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, the securities shall be returned to the contractor.

(b) Alternatively, the contractor may request and the owner shall make payment of retentions earned directly to the escrow agent. The contractor may direct the
 investment of the payments into securities and the contractor shall receive the interest earned on the investments upon the same terms provided for in this section for securities deposited by the contractor. Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, the contractor shall receive from the escrow agent all securities, interest, and payments received by the escrow agent from the owner, pursuant to the terms of this section.

(c) Alternatively, and subject to the approval and at the sole discretion of the public agency, the payment of retentions earned may be deposited directly with a person licensed under Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code as the escrow agent. Upon written request of an escrow agent who has not been approved by the public agency under this subdivision, the public agency shall provide written notice to that escrow agent within 10 business days of receipt of the request indicating the reason or
 reasons for not approving that escrow agent. An escrow agent that has been disapproved by the public agency may not maintain any cause of action of any nature against the state or any public agency, officer, agent, or employee of any public agency, in connection with the disapproval of that escrow agent. The payments shall be deposited in a trust account with a federally chartered bank or savings association within 24 hours of receipt by the escrow agent. The contractor shall not place any retentions with the escrow agent in excess of the coverage provided to that escrow agent pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17314 of the Financial Code. In all respects not inconsistent with this subdivision, the remaining provisions of this section shall apply to escrow agents acting pursuant to this subdivision. In addition, an escrow agent subject to this subdivision shall maintain insurance to cover negligent acts and omissions of the escrow agent in connection with the handling of retentions under this section in
 an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per contract, executed by an admitted insurer and in a form satisfactory to the public agency.

(d) Securities eligible for investment under this section shall include those listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code, bank or savings and loan certificates of deposit, interest-bearing demand deposit accounts, standby letters of credit, or any other security mutually agreed to by the contractor and the public agency.

The contractor shall be the beneficial owner of any securities substituted for moneys withheld and shall receive any interest thereon.

Failure to include the provisions prescribed by this section in bid and contract documents shall void any provisions for performance retentions in a public agency contract.

(e) (1) Any contractor who elects to receive interest on moneys withheld in retention by a public agency shall, at the request of any subcontractor, make that option available to the subcontractor regarding any moneys withheld in retention by the contractor from the subcontractor. If the contractor elects to receive interest on any moneys withheld in retention by a public agency, then the subcontractor shall receive the identical rate of interest received by the contractor on any retention moneys withheld from the subcontractor by the contractor, less any actual pro rata costs associated with administering and calculating that interest. In the event that the interest rate is a fluctuating rate, the rate for the subcontractor shall be determined by calculating the interest rate paid during the time that retentions were withheld from the subcontractor. If the contractor elects to substitute securities in lieu of retention, then, by mutual consent of the contractor and subcontractor, the subcontractor
 may substitute securities in exchange for the release of moneys held in retention by the contractor.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to those subcontractors performing more than 5 percent of the contractor’s total bid.

(3) A contractor shall not require any subcontractor to waive any provision of this section.

(f) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the provisions of this section are of statewide
 concern and are necessary to encourage full participation by contractors and subcontractors in public contract procedures.

(g) An escrow agreement used pursuant to this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable unless it is substantially similar to the following form:ESCROW AGREEMENT FOR
 SECURITY DEPOSITS IN LIEU OF RETENTIONThis Escrow Agreement is made and entered into by and be­tween

whose address is
 hereinafter called “owner,”
 whose address is
 hereinafter called “contractor,” and
 whose address is
 hereinafter called “escrow agent.”For the consideration hereinafter set forth, the owner, contractor, and escrow agent agree as follows:

(1) Pursuant to Section 10263 of the Public Contract Code of the State of California, the contractor has the option to deposit securities with the escrow agent as a substitute for retention
 earnings required to be withheld by the owner pursuant to the construction contract entered into between the owner and contractor for ____ in the amount of ____ dated ____ (hereafter referred to as the “contract”). Alternatively, on written request of the contractor, the owner shall make payments of the retention earnings directly to the escrow agent. When the contractor deposits the securities as a substitute for the contract earnings, the escrow agent shall notify the owner within 10 days of the deposit. The market value of the securities at the time of the substitution shall be at least equal to the cash amount then required to be withheld as retention under the terms of the contract between the owner and contractor. Securities shall be held in the name of the ____, and shall designate the contractor as the beneficial owner.

(2) The owner shall make progress payments to the contractor for those funds which otherwise would be withheld from
 progress payments pursuant to the contract provision, provided that the escrow agent holds securities in the form and amount specified above.

(3) When the owner makes payment of retentions earned directly to the escrow agent, the escrow agent shall hold them for the benefit of the contractor until such time as the escrow created under this contract is terminated. The contractor may direct the investment of the payments into securities. All terms and conditions of this agreement and the rights and responsibilities of the parties shall be equally applicable and binding when the owner pays the escrow agent directly.

(4) The contractor shall be responsible for paying all fees for the expenses incurred by the escrow agent in administering the escrow account. These expenses and payment terms shall be determined by the contractor and escrow agent.

(5) The interest earned on the securities or the money market accounts held in escrow and all interest earned on the interest shall be for the sole account of contractor and shall be subject to withdrawal by contractor at any time and from time to time without notice to the owner.

(6) The contractor shall have the right to withdraw all or any part of the principal in the escrow account only by written notice to the escrow agent accompanied by written authorization from the owner to the escrow agent that the owner consents to the withdrawal of the amount sought to be withdrawn by contractor.

(7) The owner shall have a right to draw upon the securities in the event of default by the contractor. Upon seven days’ written notice to the escrow agent from the owner of the default, the escrow agent shall immediately convert the
 securities to cash and shall distribute the cash as instructed by the owner.

(8) Upon receipt of written notification from the owner certifying that the contract is final and complete, and that the contractor has complied with all requirements and procedures applicable to the contract, the escrow agent shall release to the contractor all securities and interest on deposit less escrow fees and charges of the escrow account. The escrow shall be closed immediately upon disbursement of all moneys and securities on deposit and payments of fees and charges.

(9) The escrow agent shall rely on the written notifications from the owner and the contractor pursuant to Sections (1) to (8), inclusive, of this agreement and the owner and contractor shall hold the escrow agent harmless from the escrow agent’s release, conversion, and disbursement of the securities and interest as set forth
 above.

(10) The names of the persons who are authorized to give written notice or to receive written notice on behalf of the owner and on behalf of the contractor in connection with the foregoing, and exemplars of their respective signatures are as follows:On behalf of the owner:On behalf of the contractor:
 Title
 Title
 Name
 Name
 Signature
 Signature
 Address
 Address

 On behalf of the escrow agent:
 Title
 Name
 Signature
 Address
At the time the escrow account is opened, the owner and contractor shall deliver to the escrow agent a fully executed counterpart of this Agreement.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement by their proper officers on the date first set forth above.
 Owner
 Contractor

 Title
 Title
 Name
 Name
 Signature
 Signature(h) For purposes of this section, “contractor” includes, but is not limited to, a contractor performing a public works contract as defined in Section 1101 as well as any person or entity who would qualify as a contractor under Section 6106.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 93, Sec. 1.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10264.

(a) With the exception of projects over water requiring marine access, and which have a contract amount greater than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), in addition to the provisions for partial payment made in Section 10261, the department may make partial payments for the mobilization costs of a contract subject to this chapter, not to exceed the following:

(1) When 5 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 50 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 5
 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(2) When 10 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 75 percent of the amount bid for mobilization or 7.5 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(3) When 20 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 95 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 9.5 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(4) When 50 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 100 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 10 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(5) Upon completion of all work on the project, payment of any amount bid for mobilization in excess of 10
 percent of the original contract amount will be paid.

(b) For projects over water requiring marine access, and with a contract amount greater than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), in addition to the provisions for partial payment made in Section 10261, the department may make partial payments for the mobilization costs of a contract subject to this chapter, not to exceed the following:

(1) When 1 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 50 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 1 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(2) When 2.5 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 60 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 2.5 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(3) When 5 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 75 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 5 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(4) When 15 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 95 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 10 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(5) When 40 percent of the original contract amount is earned, 100 percent of the amount bid for mobilization, or 15 percent of the original contract amount, whichever is lesser, may be paid.

(6) Upon completion of all work on the project, payment of any amount bid for mobilization in excess of 15 percent of the original contract amount shall be paid.

This subdivision shall apply only to contracts that are advertised subsequent to the date that the act adding this subdivision becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 965, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10265.

A claim pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code is not required, but legal action on any claim shall be commenced within the time period specified in Section 10240.1. The department may compromise or otherwise settle any claims arising from the contract at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Offenses [10280. - 10284.]

10280.

Any officer or employee of the department who corruptly performs any official act to the injury of the state, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.

Any contractor or his agent or employee who corruptly permits the violation of any contract awarded under this part to the injury of the state, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10282.

Any subcontractor or agent or employee of any contractor or subcontractor, who has knowledge of any work being done in violation of any contract under this part and does not immediately notify the department or the inspector or resident engineer upon the project of the violation, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10283.

Such felonies are punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 555.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10284.

Such persons are also liable to the state for double the amount the state may have lost, or be liable to lose by reason of the acts made crimes by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Ineligibility to Contract [10285. - 10285.5.]

10285.

The term “person,” as used in this article, means any individual, partnership, joint venture, or association or any other organization or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.1.

Any state agency may suspend, for a period of up to three years from the date of conviction, any person from bidding upon, or being awarded, a public works or services contract with the agency under this part or from being a subcontractor at any tier upon the contract, if that person, or any partner, member, officer, director, responsible managing officer, or responsible managing employee thereof, has been convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of any charge of fraud, bribery, collusion, conspiracy, or any other act in violation of any state or federal antitrust law in connection with the bidding upon, award of, or performance of, any public works
 contract, as defined in Section 1101, with any public entity, as defined in Section 1100, including, for the purposes of this article, the Regents of the University of California or the Trustees of the California State University. A state agency may determine the eligibility of any person to enter into a contract under this article by requiring the person to submit a statement under penalty of perjury declaring that neither the person nor any subcontractor to be engaged by the person has been convicted of any of the offenses referred to in this section within the preceding three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.2.

Before suspending any person under this article, the state agency shall provide a hearing upon reasonable notice. In determining whether to suspend, and the duration of any suspension, the state agency shall consider, in addition to any other relevant factors, both of the following:

(a) The degree to which the person cooperated with the state or federal authorities in the criminal proceeding.

(b) The degree to which the person has agreed to restitution for any damages incurred by the public entity as a result of the acts upon
 which the conviction was based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.3.

In the event that any state agency has suspended any person under this article, any other state agency shall adopt the terms of that suspension without further notice or hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.4.

In the event that any state agency has suspended any person under this article, that agency may terminate the suspension if it determines that termination is in the best interest of the agency. In the event of termination, any suspension by adoption pursuant to Section 10285.3 also shall be terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10285.5.

Nothing in this article shall require any state agency to contract with, or to permit the employment of a person as a subcontractor, or any person on any project funded in whole or part by federal funds, if the person has been suspended or debarred by the federal agency providing the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. California Taxpayer and Shareholder Protection Act of 2003 [10286. - 10286.1.]

10286.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Taxpayer and Shareholder Protection Act of 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 657, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10286.1.

(a) For purposes of this part, except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a state agency shall not enter into any contract with an expatriate corporation or its subsidiaries.

(b) (1) For purposes of this chapter, an “expatriate corporation” means a foreign incorporated entity that is publicly traded in the United States to which all of the following apply:

(A) The United States is the principal market for the public trading of the foreign incorporated entity.

(B) The foreign incorporated entity has no substantial
 business activities in the place of incorporation.

(C) Either clause (i) or clause (ii) applies:

(i) The foreign entity was established in connection with a transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which (I) the foreign entity directly or indirectly acquired substantially all of the properties held by a domestic corporation or all of the properties constituting a trade or business of a domestic partnership or related foreign partnership, and (II) immediately after the acquisition, more than 50 percent of the publicly traded stock, by vote or value, of the foreign entity is held by former shareholders of the domestic corporation or by former partners of the domestic partnership or related foreign partnership. For purposes of subclause (II), any stock sold in a public offering related to the transaction or a series of transactions is disregarded.

(ii) The foreign entity was established in connection with a transaction or series of related transactions pursuant to which (I) the foreign entity directly or indirectly acquired substantially all of the properties held by a domestic corporation or all of the properties constituting a trade or business of a domestic partnership or related foreign partnership, and (II) the acquiring foreign entity is more than 50 percent owned, by vote or value, by domestic shareholders or partners.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, indirect acquisition of property includes the acquisition of a stock share, or any portion thereof, of the owner of that property.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, neither of the following are an “expatriate corporation”:

(A) A foreign
 incorporated entity that is publicly traded in the United States if all of the following are true:

(i) The foreign incorporated entity, or any predecessor entity, was originally established in connection with a transaction or series of related transactions between unrelated publicly traded corporations.

(ii) Immediately after the transaction or series of related transactions, not more than 70 percent of the publicly traded stock, by vote or value, of the foreign incorporated entity is held in the manner described in clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(iii) The transaction or series of related transactions that originally established the foreign incorporated entity, or any predecessor entity, was a taxable transaction for any United States shareholders of any domestic corporation that was a party to such
 transaction.

(iv) The foreign incorporated entity is both of the following:

(I) Created or organized under the laws of a foreign country with which the United States has a comprehensive income tax treaty.

(II) Considered a resident of that foreign country for purposes of that treaty, or any successor treaty with that foreign country meeting the requirements of this paragraph.

(B) Any successor corporation that meets the requirements of clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) that is a successor corporation resulting from a corporate reorganization as defined in Section 368 of the Internal Revenue Code or from a transaction satisfying the requirements of Section 351 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a state agency may contract with an expatriate corporation, or its subsidiary, if it was an expatriate corporation before January 1, 2004, to which both of the following apply:

(A) The foreign entity provides, by operation of law, by provisions of its governing documents, by resolution of its board of directors, or in any other manner, at least the following shareholders’ rights:

(i) Shareholders of the entity have the right to inspect, at a principal place of business in the United States, copies of the entity’s books and records, including, but not limited to, shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings in accordance with the corporation law, as amended from time to time and as that law is interpreted by the courts, of the United States jurisdiction in which the entity was previously incorporated, or, if the entity was not
 previously incorporated, in accordance with the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporation Act, as that act may be amended from time to time, provided that, if the corporate law of the United States jurisdiction in which the entity was previously incorporated or the Model Business Corporation Act does not provide access to the shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings, these books and records are available for inspection by shareholders for purposes properly related to their status as shareholders of the entity.

(ii) The entity permits its shareholders to bring derivative proceedings on behalf of the entity, provided that these derivative proceedings are brought on a basis and under the terms applicable under the law, as amended from time to time and as interpreted by, or required by, the courts of the United States jurisdiction in which the entity was previously incorporated, or, if the entity was not previously incorporated, on a
 basis and under the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporations Act as that act may be amended from time to time and as it is interpreted by, or required by, the courts.

(iii) Entity transactions in which any director is interested are approved in accordance with the applicable law, as amended from time to time and as interpreted by the courts, of the United States jurisdiction in which the entity was previously incorporated, or, if the entity was not previously incorporated, in accordance with the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporations Act, as may be amended from time to time and as interpreted by the courts.

(iv) The entity has consented to the jurisdiction, for any otherwise available cause of action by or on behalf of the entity’s shareholders, including any pendent state causes of action, of all of the following courts:

(I) The state courts of one or more states.

(II) The United States federal courts in any state in which the entity consents to the jurisdiction of that state’s courts pursuant to subclause (I).

(v) The entity has appointed an agent for service of process in the state or states in which the entity has consented to jurisdiction, as described in clause (iv), and the entity meets at least one of the following conditions:

(I) The entity has unencumbered assets in the United States, which assets may include equity or debt investments in United States companies, with a book value in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), and the entity delivers to the Secretary of State an opinion of an attorney licensed in the United States that judgments rendered
 against the entity may be satisfied by using these assets.

(II) The entity posts a bond or similar security in an amount of at least fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(III) The entity has directors’ and officers’ insurance in an amount of at least fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(vi) The entity agrees that, in connection with any lawsuit brought against it by its shareholders in any court in which the entity has consented to jurisdiction as described in clause (iv), the entity will provide to the court notice of the manner in which the entity complied with clause (v) and, if the entity complied with that clause in the manner specified in subclause (I) of clause (v), a copy of the opinion described in that subclause.

(vii) Shareholder approval is
 required for any sale of all or substantially all of the entity’s assets in accordance with the law, as amended from time to time and as it is interpreted by the courts, of the United States jurisdiction in which it was previously incorporated, or, if it was not previously incorporated, in accordance with the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporations Act, as it may be amended from time to time.

(viii) The directors and officers of the entity occupy a fiduciary relationship with the entity and its shareholders and these directors and officers, in performing their duties, act in good faith in a manner that a director or officer believes to be in the best interests of the entity and its shareholders, as that standard of care is interpreted by the courts.

(ix) The entity agrees to hold no more than one of every four annual shareholder meetings in a location outside the United
 States and, in the event that the entity holds an annual meeting outside the United States, the entity agrees to provide access to that meeting through a Web cast or other technology that allows the entity’s shareholders to do both of the following:

(I) Listen to the meeting, watch the meeting, or both.

(II) Send questions that will be addressed at the meeting.

(x) The entity provides a description of the shareholder rights described in clauses (i) to (ix), inclusive, and any subsequent changes to these rights, on the entity’s Web site or in its 10K filings with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(B) The entity uses worldwide combined reporting to calculate the income on which it pays taxes to the state.

(c) The chief executive officer of a state agency or his or her designee may waive the prohibition specified in subdivision (a) if the executive officer or his or her designee has made a written finding that the contract is necessary to meet a compelling public interest. For purposes of this section, a “compelling public interest” includes, but is not limited to, ensuring the provision of essential services, ensuring the public health and safety, or an emergency as defined in Section 1102. If a waiver is granted to a vendor pursuant to this subdivision, the requirement to submit a declaration of compliance, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), does not apply to that vendor.

(d) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “state agency” means every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, and the California State University, but does not
 include the University of California, the Legislature, the courts, or any agency in the judicial branch of government.

(2) On or after January 1, 2004, all state agencies shall, as a condition of the contract, require any vendor that is offered a contract to do business with the state to submit a declaration stating that the vendor is eligible to contract with the state pursuant to this section.

(3) A vendor that declares as true any material matter in a declaration described in this subdivision that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and subdivision (f), this section applies to contracts that are entered into on or after January 1, 2004.

(2) With respect to an entity
 that was an expatriate corporation, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), before January 1, 2004, this section applies to contracts that are entered into on or after April 1, 2004.

(f) (1) The declaration requirement set forth in subdivision (d) does not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.

(2) The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. State Acquisition of Goods and Services [10290. - 10490.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10290. - 10290.3.]

10290.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Department” means the Department of General Services.

(b) “Director” means the Director of General Services.

(c) “Centralized purchasing” means the purchase for state agencies of materials, supplies, and equipment by the Office of Procurement.

(d) “Goods” means all types of tangible personal property, including materials, supplies, and equipment.

(e) “Office” means the Office of Procurement in the Department of General Services.

(f) “Price schedule” means an agreement between the Office of Procurement and a supplier under which the supplier agrees to accept orders from the office or a state agency for specified goods at set prices for a specified period of time but which does not obligate the office or state agencies to contract for the specified goods from the supplier.

(g) “Regional contract” means a contract of the same type as a statewide contract but applicable only to specified contracting in a particular area or region of the state.

(h) “Statewide contract” means a contract awarded by the Office of Procurement to one or more suppliers for the acquisition of specified goods for a period of time, at a price, and in an amount set forth in the contract.

(i) “Multiple award” means a contract of indefinite quantity for one or more similar goods, information technology, or services to more than one supplier.

(j) “Multiple award schedule” (MAS) is an agreement established between the General Services Administration of the United States and certain suppliers to do business under specific prices, terms, and conditions for specified goods, information technology, or services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 918, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10290.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in exercising their delegation of contracting authority from the department, state agencies may contract for goods, information technology, or services with suppliers who have multiple award schedules with the General Services Administration of the United States if the supplier is willing to extend those terms, conditions, and prices. The department may also develop multiple award schedules or agreements for use by state agencies in the same manner.

(b) The department shall determine the delegation contracting authority for agencies wishing to contract with suppliers who have multiple award schedules. The department shall seek input from both customer departments and agencies and private sector suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10290.3.

(a) Notwithstanding the bidding provisions of this chapter, reverse auctions may be utilized for the acquisition of goods and services. The reverse auction process shall include a specification of an opening date and time when real-time electronic bids may be accepted, and provide that the procedure shall remain open until the designated closing date and time.

(b) All bids on reverse auctions shall be posted electronically on the Internet, updated on a real-time basis, and shall allow registered bidders to lower the price of their bid below the lowest bid posted on the Internet.

(c) The Department of General Services shall require vendors to register before the reverse auction opening date and time, and as part of the registration, agree to any terms and conditions and other requirements of the solicitation. The Department of General Services may require vendors to be prequalified prior to placing bids in a reverse auction.

(d) For purposes of this section, “reverse auction” means a competitive online solicitation process for fungible goods or services in which vendors compete against each other online in real time in an open and interactive environment.

(e) The reverse auction process may not be used for bidding on any construction contract that is subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval of Contracts [10295. - 10299.5.]

10295.

(a) All contracts entered into by any state agency for (1) the acquisition of goods or elementary school textbooks, (2) services, whether or not the services involve the furnishing or use of goods or are performed by an independent contractor, (3) the construction, alteration, improvement, repair, or maintenance of property, real or personal, or (4) the performance of work or services by the state agency for or in cooperation with any person, or public body, are void unless and until approved by the department. Every contract shall be transmitted with all papers, estimates, and recommendations concerning it to the department and, if approved by the department, shall be effective from the date of the approval.

(b) This section applies to a state agency that by
 general or specific statute is expressly or impliedly authorized to enter into transactions referred to in this section.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:
